Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2416
Advertisements by member insurers of coverage by association; prohibited.

Advertisements by member insurers which include a reference to the coverage of the insurance guaranty association are specifically prohibited.

Laws 1971, LB 722, § 16.